California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
“Train operator” includes any person that owns, operates, or controls a diesel-powered train and is licensed as a railroad by a state or federal agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 76, Sec. 10.   Effective July 16, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60042.

“Diesel-powered train” means any diesel-powered equipment or machinery that rides on rails, including equipment or machinery that transports passengers, freight, or a combination of both passengers and freight, and equipment or machinery that only carries freight or passengers of the operator thereof. Thus, the term includes a locomotive, work train, switching engine, and track maintenance machine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60043.

(a) “Government entity” means this state and its political subdivisions except for a political subdivision that is only an exempt bus operator.

(b) Sections 60146 and 60205.5 do not apply to a government entity if both of the following apply:

(1) The diesel fuel is purchased tax-paid from a supplier or retail vendor.

(2) The tax-paid diesel fuel is used solely for the operation of a diesel-powered highway vehicle within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 22.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

60044.

“Retail vendor” means any person who sells to a highway vehicle operator diesel fuel delivered in this state into a storage tank or into a fuel tank of a diesel-powered highway vehicle and at the time of sale collects diesel fuel tax from the highway vehicle operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 34, Sec. 4.   Effective June 30, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 22 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

60047.

“Pipeline” means a fuel distribution system that moves diesel fuel, in the bulk, through a pipe, from a refinery to a terminal, from a terminal to another terminal, from a vessel to a terminal, or from a refinery or terminal to a vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 43.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60047.1.

“Pipeline operator” includes any person that owns, operates, or otherwise controls a pipeline.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 44.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60048.

“Sale” means:

(a) The transfer of title to diesel fuel (other than diesel fuel in a terminal) to a buyer for consideration, which may consist of money, services, or other property.

(b) The transfer of the inventory position in the diesel fuel in a terminal if the buyer becomes the positionholder with respect to the diesel fuel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 45.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60048.1.

“Tax-paid fuel” or “tax paid” means the gallons of diesel fuel acquired on either a temperature corrected or volumetric basis on which the tax in Section 60050 has been imposed at the time of or prior to the acquisition by the supplier or person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 46.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60049.

“Vessel” means a waterborne vessel used for transporting diesel fuel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 47.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60049.1.

“Vessel operator” means any person that operates or otherwise controls a vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 48.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Imposition of Tax [60050. - 60064.]

60050.

(a) (1) A tax of sixteen cents ($0.16) is hereby imposed upon each gallon of diesel fuel subject to the tax in Sections 60051, 60052, and 60058.

(2) If the federal fuel tax is reduced below the rate of fifteen cents ($0.15) per gallon and federal financial allocations to this state for highway and exclusive public mass transit
 guideway purposes are reduced or eliminated correspondingly, the tax rate imposed by paragraph (1) shall be increased by an amount so that the combined state rate under paragraph (1) and the federal tax rate per gallon equal what it would have been in the absence of the federal reduction.

(3) If any person or entity is exempt or partially exempt from the federal fuel tax at the time of a reduction, the person or entity shall continue to be exempt under this section.

(b) On and after November 1, 2017, in addition to the tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), an additional tax of twenty cents ($0.20) is hereby imposed upon each gallon of diesel fuel subject to the tax in Sections 60051, 60052, and 60058.

(c) On July 1, 2020, and every July 1 thereafter, the State Board of Equalization shall adjust the taxes imposed
 by subdivisions (a) and (b), with the adjustment to apply to both the base tax rates specified in those provisions and to any previous adjustment in rates made pursuant to this subdivision, by increasing the taxes by a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance with the resulting taxes rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one cent ($0.01). The first adjustment pursuant to this subdivision shall be a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index from November 1, 2017, to November 1, 2019. Subsequent annual adjustments shall cover subsequent 12-month periods. The incremental change shall be added to the associated rate for that year.

(d) Changes to the taxes imposed under this section that are enacted by legislation subsequent to July 1, 2017, shall be deemed to be changes to the base tax rates for purposes of the California Consumer
 Price Index calculation and adjustment performed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 203.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

60050.1.

(a) For the privilege of storing, for the purpose of removal, sales, or use, every wholesaler owning undyed diesel fuel on July 1, 1995, shall pay a tax of eighteen cents ($0.18) for each gallon of undyed diesel fuel according to the volumetric measure thereof, on which a tax has not been imposed under Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601) as in effect on June 30, 1995, and tax would have been imposed on any prior removal, entry, or sale of undyed diesel fuel had Sections 60050 to 60061, inclusive, applied to undyed diesel fuel for the
 period before July 1, 1995.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a):

(1) “Storing” includes the possession in a storage facility, except an approved terminal or refinery, or a container of any kind, including the fuel tanks of motor vehicles, of undyed diesel fuel and the undyed diesel fuel purchased from and invoiced by the seller prior to July 1, 1995, and in transit on that date.

(2) “Owning” means having title to the undyed diesel fuel.

(3) “Wholesaler” means any person who sells diesel fuel in this state for resale to a retailer or to a person who is not a retailer and subsequently uses the diesel fuel and was required to be licensed under Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601) as a wholesaler as in effect on June 30, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60050.2.

(a) For the privilege of storing, for the purpose of sale, each supplier, wholesaler, and retailer owning 1,000 or more gallons of tax-paid diesel fuel on November 1, 2017, shall pay a storage tax of twenty cents ($0.20) per gallon of tax-paid diesel fuel in storage according to the volumetric measure thereof.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Owning” means having title to the diesel fuel.

(2) “Retailer” means any person who sells diesel fuel in this state to a person who subsequently uses the diesel fuel.

(3) “Storing” includes the ownership or possession of tax-paid diesel fuel outside of the bulk transfer/terminal system, including the holding of tax-paid diesel fuel for sale at wholesale or retail locations stored in a container of any kind, including railroad tank cars and trucks or trailer cargo tanks. “Storing” also includes tax-paid diesel fuel purchased from and invoiced by the seller, and tax-paid diesel fuel removed from a terminal or entered into by a supplier, prior to the date specified in subdivision (a) and in transit on that date.

(4) “Wholesaler” means any person who sells diesel fuel in this state for resale to a
 retailer or to a person who is not a retailer and subsequently uses the diesel fuel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 33.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

60051.

The tax specified in Section 60050 is imposed on the removal of diesel fuel in this state from a terminal if the diesel fuel is removed at the rack.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60052.

The tax specified in Section 60050 is also imposed on all of the following:

(a) The removal of diesel fuel in this state from any refinery if either of the following applies:

(1) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the diesel fuel immediately before the removal is not a diesel fuel registrant.

(2) The removal is at
 the refinery rack.

(b) The entry of diesel fuel into this state for sale, consumption, use, or warehousing if either of the following applies:

(1) The entry is by bulk transfer and the enterer is not a diesel fuel registrant.

(2) The entry is not by bulk transfer.

(c) The removal or sale of diesel fuel in this state to an unregistered person unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the diesel fuel.

(d) The removal or sale of blended diesel fuel in this state by the blender thereof. The number of gallons of blended diesel fuel subject to tax is the difference between the total number of gallons of blended diesel fuel removed or sold and the number of gallons of previously
 taxed diesel fuel used to produce the blended diesel fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 49.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60053.

Every refiner shall pay tax on the removal of diesel fuel from a refinery as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 60052.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60054.

Every position holder shall pay the tax on the removal of diesel fuel from a terminal as defined under Section 60051.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60055.

Any person that produces blended diesel fuel outside the bulk transfer/terminal system (the blender) shall pay tax as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 60052.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60056.

Every qualified highway vehicle operator is liable for the backup tax imposed under subdivision (a) of Section 60058.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 50.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60057.

Every highway vehicle operator/fueler is liable for the backup tax imposed under Section 60058.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 51.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60058.

The tax specified in Section 60050 is imposed as a backup tax as follows:

(a) On the delivery into the fuel tank of a diesel-powered highway vehicle of:

(1) Any diesel fuel that contains a dye.

(2) Any diesel fuel on which a claim for refund has been allowed.

(3) Any liquid on
 which tax has not been imposed by this part, Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301), or Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601). 

(b) On the sale of any diesel fuel on which a claim for refund has been allowed.

(c) On the sale and delivery into the fuel tank of a diesel-powered highway vehicle of any diesel fuel that contains a dye or any liquid on which tax has not been imposed by this part, Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301), or Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601).

(d) For the purposes of this section, aircraft jet fuel on which tax has been imposed only pursuant to Part 2, Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 7385) shall be deemed to be a liquid on which tax has not been imposed by Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 52.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60059.

The terminal operator is jointly and severally liable for the tax imposed under Section 60051 if both of the following apply:

(a) The position holder with respect to the diesel fuel is a person other than the terminal operator and is not a diesel fuel registrant.

(b) The terminal operator has not met the conditions of Section 60060.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60060.

A terminal operator is not liable for tax under Section 60059, if at the time of the removal, all of the following apply:

(a) The terminal operator is a diesel fuel registrant.

(b) The terminal operator has an unexpired notification certificate from the position holder as required by the Internal Revenue Service.

(c) The terminal operator has no reason to believe that
 any information in the certificate is false.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60061.

Every enterer shall pay tax on diesel fuel imported into this state as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 60052.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60062.

The terminal operator is jointly and severally liable for the tax imposed under Section 60051 if, in connection with the removal of diesel fuel that is not dyed or marked in accordance with the United States Environmental Protection Agency or Internal Revenue Service requirements, the terminal operator provides any person with any bill of lading, shipping paper, or similar document indicating that the diesel fuel is dyed or marked in accordance with the United States Environmental Protection Agency or Internal Revenue Service requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60063.

(a) The board may accept from the person who receives diesel fuel removed at a refinery or terminal rack an amount equal to the tax due and required to be paid by the refiner or positionholder upon the removal of the diesel fuel from a refinery or terminal rack, as if the amount were payment of the tax by the refiner or positionholder under Section 60051 or 60052, as the case may be, if the Internal Revenue Service authorizes payment of federal fuel taxes by the receiving party under a two-party exchange agreement or similar
 arrangement.

(b) The refiner or positionholder shall remain primarily liable for payment of the tax imposed by Section 60051 or 60052 for diesel fuel removed at the refinery or terminal rack, as the case may be, plus any penalty or interest, until the amount is finally paid and credited to the account of the responsible refiner or positionholder; provided, however, that the board, at its discretion, may relieve the refiner or positionholder from primary liability for payment of tax imposed by Section 60051 or 60052 and hold another person primarily liable for the tax if (i) the Internal Revenue Service authorizes payment of fuel taxes by the receiving party under a two-party exchange agreement, and (ii) under the Internal Revenue Service approach to a two-party exchange agreement, another person is primarily liable for payment of the tax, and (iii) the board elects to follow the Internal Revenue Service approach.

(c) The board may adopt those regulations as it deems appropriate to carry out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

60064.

(a) For the purpose of the proper administration of this part and to prevent evasion of the tax, unless the contrary is established, it shall be presumed that all diesel fuel received at a terminal in this state, imported into this state, or refined and placed into storage for removal at a refinery in this state or blended diesel fuel blended or converted in this state and no longer in the possession of the supplier has been removed or sold by the supplier.

(b) The presumption shall not apply if the supplier proves to the satisfaction of the board that both:

(1) The supplier has exercised ordinary care in entrusting control or possession of the diesel fuel to another person.

(2) The person to whom the supplier has entrusted the control or possession of the diesel fuel as bailee, consignee, employee, or agent, caused a removal or sale by the act of converting to that person’s own use the diesel fuel so entrusted to that person by the supplier.

(c) If the supplier proves to the satisfaction of the board, the existence of both of the circumstances in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), then the person who converted the diesel fuel to his or her own use, as well as any other person receiving that diesel fuel
 with the knowledge that it was so converted, shall be liable for payment of the tax imposed upon the removal or sale, and all those persons shall be considered as suppliers for the purpose of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 60201) or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60401) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 54.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Exemptions [60100. - 60108.]

60100.

(a) The provisions of this part requiring the payment of taxes do not apply to any of the following:

(1) The removal from a terminal or refinery of, or the entry or sale of, any diesel fuel if all of the following apply:

(A) The person otherwise liable for tax is a diesel fuel registrant.

(B) In the case of a removal from a terminal, the terminal
 is an approved terminal.

(C) The diesel fuel satisfies the dyeing and marking requirements of Section 60101.

(2) Any entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of taxable diesel fuel transferred in bulk to a refinery or terminal if the persons involved (including the terminal operator) are registered.

(3) The removal of diesel fuel if all of the following apply:

(A) The diesel fuel is removed by railroad car from an approved refinery and is received at an approved terminal.

(B) The refinery and the terminal are operated by the same diesel fuel registrant.

(C) The refinery is not served by pipeline (other than a pipeline for
 the receipt of crude oil) or vessel.

(4) Diesel fuel which, pursuant to the contract of sale, is required to be shipped and is shipped to a point outside of this state by a supplier by means of any of the following:

(A) Facilities operated by the supplier.

(B) Delivery by the supplier to a carrier, customs broker, or forwarding agent, whether hired by the purchaser or not, for shipment to the out-of-state point.

(C) Delivery by the supplier to any vessel clearing from a port of this state for a port outside of this state and actually exported from this state in the vessel.

(5) Backup tax does not apply to delivery of diesel fuel into the fuel tank of a diesel-powered highway vehicle as
 provided in Section 60058 for any of the following:

(A) Use on a farm for farming purposes.

(B) Use in an exempt bus operation.

(C) Use in a diesel-powered highway vehicle that is operated off the highway.

(D) Use in a diesel-powered highway vehicle that is owned and operated by a government entity.

(E) Use by the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities.

(6) Diesel fuel sold by credit card certified by the United States Department of State to any consulate officer or consulate employee of a foreign government who is not engaged in any private occupation for gain within this state, who uses the diesel fuel in a
 motor vehicle which is registered with the United States Department of State, and whose government has done either of the following:

(A) Entered into a treaty with the United States providing for the exemption of its representatives from national, state, and municipal taxes.

(B) Granted a similar exemption to representatives of the United States.

(7) Diesel fuel sold by a supplier to a train operator for use in a diesel-powered train or for other off-highway use and the supplier has on hand an exemption certificate from the train operator.

(8) Diesel fuel sold by a supplier to the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Carrier” means a person or firm engaged in the business of transporting for compensation property owned by other persons, and includes both common and contract carriers.

(2) “Forwarding agent” means a person or firm engaged in the business of preparing property for shipment or arranging for its shipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60101.

(a) Diesel fuel that is required to be dyed satisfies the dyeing requirement of this part if it meets the dyeing requirements of the United States Environmental Protection Agency and the Internal Revenue Service, including, but not limited to, requirements respecting type, dosage, and timing.

(b) Marking shall meet the marking requirements of the Internal Revenue Service.

(c) No person shall operate or maintain
 a motor vehicle on any public highway in this state with dyed diesel fuel in the fuel supply tank. This subdivision does not apply to uses of dyed diesel fuel on the highway that are lawful under the Internal Revenue Code or regulations promulgated thereunder, if the person is registered as a qualified highway vehicle operator, exempt bus operator, or government entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

60102.

Notice is required with respect to dyed diesel fuel. In general, a notice stating: “DYED DIESEL FUEL, NONTAXABLE USE ONLY, PENALTY FOR TAXABLE USE” shall be:

(a) Provided by the terminal operator to any person that receives dyed diesel fuel at a terminal rack of that terminal operator.

(b) Provided by any seller of dyed diesel fuel to its buyer if the diesel fuel is located outside the bulk transfer/terminal system and is not sold
 from a retail pump posted in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (c).

(c) Posted by a seller on any retail pump where it sells dyed diesel fuel for use by its buyer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60103.

The form of notice required under subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 60102, shall be provided by the time of the removal or sale and shall appear on shipping papers, bills of lading, and invoices accompanying the sale or removal of the dyed diesel fuel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60105.

(a) A penalty applies to any person who does any of the following:

(1) Sells or holds for sale dyed diesel fuel for any use that the person knows or has reason to know is a taxable use of the diesel fuel.

(2) Holds for use or uses dyed diesel fuel for a use other than a nontaxable use and that person knew, or had reason to know, that the diesel fuel was so dyed.

(3) Knowingly alters, or attempts to alter, the strength or composition of any dye or marker in any dyed diesel fuel.

(4) Fails to provide or post the required notice with respect to any dyed diesel fuel. The failure to provide or post the required notice creates a presumption that the person so failing knows the diesel fuel will be used for a taxable use.

(b) The amount of the penalty for each violation specified in subdivision (a) is the greater of:

(1) Ten dollars ($10) for every gallon of diesel fuel involved, or

(2) The product of one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the total number of penalties, including the penalty currently being determined, imposed by this section on the person (or a
 related person or any predecessor of that person or related person).

(c) If a penalty is imposed under this section on any business entity, each officer, employee, or agent of the entity, who participated in any act giving rise to the penalty shall be jointly and severally liable with the entity for the penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 56.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60106.

Any sale of diesel fuel to a train operator claimed as exempt from taxes under paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 60100 shall be supported by an exemption certificate executed by the purchaser in a form as prescribed by the board. The supplier shall retain the certificate in his or her records in support of the exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60106.1.

In order to issue an exemption certificate as provided in Section 60106, the train operator shall obtain a permit from the board. Every application for a permit shall be made upon a form prescribed by the board and shall set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of his or her place or places of business, and such other information as the board may require. The application shall be signed by the owner if a natural person; in the case of an association or partnership, by a member or partner; in the case
 of a corporation, by an executive officer or some person specifically authorized by the corporation to sign the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60106.2.

If a purchaser gives a Section 60106 exemption certificate to a supplier that the diesel fuel purchased will be used in a manner or for a purpose entitling the supplier to regard the removal as exempt from the taxes as provided in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 60100 and sells the diesel fuel or uses the diesel fuel in some other manner or for some other purpose, the purchaser shall be liable for payment of the tax under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 60050) of this part. The tax, applicable penalties, and interest
 shall become due and payable and shall be ascertained and determined in the same manner as the backup tax under Section 60361.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 57.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60106.3.

(a) Any person, including any officer or employee of a corporation, who gives a Section 60106 exemption certificate for diesel fuel that he or she knows at the time of purchase is not to be used by him or her or the corporation in the manner or for the purpose entitling the exemption for the purpose of evading payment to the supplier of the amount of the tax applicable to the transaction is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 60706 or a felony punishable as provided in Section 60707.

(b) Any person, including any officer or employee of a corporation, who gives a certificate for diesel fuel pursuant to Section 60106 that he or she knows at the time of purchase is not to be used by him or her or the corporation in the manner or for the purpose entitling the exemption is liable to the state for the amount of tax that would be due if he or she had not given that certificate. In addition to the tax, the person shall be liable to the state for a penalty of 25 percent of the tax or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater, for each certificate issued for personal gain or to evade the payment of taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 58.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60107.

(a) For the privilege of purchasing diesel fuel exempt from taxes under paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 60100, each train operator must make a report to the board showing:

(1) The name and permit number of the supplier from whom it purchased undyed diesel fuel and the number of gallons of undyed diesel fuel purchased that is exempt from the tax.

(2) Any other information required by the board.

(b) Each train operator shall prepare and file with the board a report in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the information in subdivision (a) during each quarterly reporting period. The report shall be filed with the board on or before the last day of the calendar month following the close of the quarterly period to which it relates. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of these reports for other than quarterly periods. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(c) The board may revoke the train operator’s permit provided for in Section 60106.1 due to the filing of inaccurate or improper reports.

(d) All of the administrative provisions of this part
 relating to a supplier shall be applicable to a train operator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60108.

Notwithstanding the exemption provided for in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 60100, any government entity using diesel fuel exempt from tax under subparagraph (D) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 60100 shall, for the privilege of operating diesel-powered highway vehicles on highways in this state, make a payment equal to the tax specified in Section 60050 for each gallon of exempt diesel fuel used. The payments required by this subdivision shall be paid to the State Board of Equalization in the manner prescribed by
 the board, and the payments shall be treated as a tax for all purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 34, Sec. 7.   Effective June 30, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 22 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Interstate Users [60110. - 60128.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [60110. - 60114.]

60110.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this chapter and this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60111.

“Interstate user” includes any person who uses diesel fuel in the operation of a qualified motor vehicle in this state and who operates the qualified motor vehicle within and without this state or the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60112.

“Qualified motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle used, designed, or maintained for transportation of persons or property that (a) has two axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross vehicle weight exceeding 26,000 pounds or 11,797 kilograms, (b) has three or more axles regardless of weight, or (c) is used in combination, when the weight of that combination exceeds 26,000 pounds or 11,797 kilograms gross vehicle weight. “Qualified motor vehicle” does not include recreational vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60113.

“Recreational vehicle” means motor vehicles such as motor homes, pickup trucks with attached campers, and buses when used exclusively for personal pleasure by an individual. In order to qualify as a recreational vehicle, the motor vehicle shall not be used in connection with any business endeavor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60114.

“Diesel vendor” means every person who sells diesel fuel in this state and places, or causes to be placed, the diesel fuel into a fuel tank of a qualified motor vehicle and at the time of sale, collects the diesel fuel tax from an interstate user.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 79.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Imposition of Tax [60115. - 60116.]

60115.

For the privilege of using diesel fuel in a qualified motor vehicle in this state by interstate users, there is hereby imposed upon any interstate user for each gallon of diesel fuel used in this state, a tax consisting of the following two components:

(a) A tax at the rate imposed by Section 60050.

(b) A tax at the rate prescribed by Section 60116.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 618, Sec. 3.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60116.

(a) Commencing January 1, 1998, and on each January 1 up to and including January 1, 2013, the board shall establish a tax rate per gallon, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of a cent ($0.001), by multiplying the average retail price per gallon (including the federal excise tax and excluding the state excise tax and the sales and use tax) of diesel fuel sold in this state by a percentage equal to the
 combined state and local sales tax rate established by Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) and Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. The average retail price per gallon shall be the average of weekly retail prices for the 12-month period ending August 31 of the year prior to the effective date of the new rate. In determining the average retail price per gallon, the board shall use the weekly average retail price published by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, in its publication “Fuel Price And Supply Update.” In the event the “Fuel Price And Supply Update” is delayed or discontinued, the board may base its determination on other sources of the average retail price of diesel fuel. The board shall make its determination of the rate no later than October 1 of the year prior to the effective date of the new rate.

(b) The tax rate established by the board on January 1, 2013, shall remain in effect only through June 30, 2013.

(c) Commencing on July 1, 2013, and on each July 1 thereafter, the board shall establish a tax rate per gallon, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one cent ($0.001), by multiplying the average retail price per gallon (including the federal excise tax and excluding the state excise tax and the sales and use tax) of diesel fuel sold in this state by a percentage equal to the combined state and local sales tax rate established by Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) and Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. The average retail price per gallon shall be the average of weekly retail prices for the 12-month period ending on the last day of January prior to the effective date of the new rate. In determining the
 average retail price per gallon, the board shall use the weekly average retail price as reported by the United States Energy Information Administration (EIA). In the event the EIA information is delayed or discontinued, the board may base its determination on other sources of the average retail price of diesel fuel. The board shall make its determination of the rate no later than March 1 of the same year as the effective date of the new rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 19.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licenses for Interstate Users [60120. - 60122.]

60120.

Every person operating a qualified motor vehicle within and without this state or the United States shall apply to the board for a license on forms prescribed by the board. It is unlawful for any person to be an interstate user without first securing a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

60121.

Before granting a license to an interstate user, the board may require the person to file with the board security pursuant to Section 60401. The license issued to any interstate user is not transferable and is valid until canceled or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

60122.

The board or its authorized representative may issue a California fuel trip permit to interstate users for entry into this state. The California fuel trip permit shall be valid for four consecutive days and includes any reentry into the state during the four-day period. The fee for issuance of a California fuel trip permit is thirty dollars ($30). Other provisions of this article and Article 1 (commencing with Section 60201) of Chapter 6 shall not apply to the holder of a California fuel trip permit who uses only diesel fuel brought into this state in the